District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Expanding Access to Public Restrooms Act of 2025”.
Sec. 1. Definitions.
(a) “Business Improvement District” or “BID” has the same meaning as defined in § 2–
1215.02.
(b) “DPR” means Department of Parks and Recreation.
(c) “Public Restroom Facility” means a gender-neutral restroom maintained by the
District or a third-party and accessible to the public free of charge, 7 days a week, from at least 8


a.m. to 8 p.m. This may include a utility-free restroom but shall not include a portable restroom.
Sec. 2. Business Improvement District and Main Street Public Restroom Facility Fund.
(a) There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Business Improvement District and
Main Street Public Restroom Facility Fund (“Fund”), which shall be used solely for the purposes
set forth in subsection (c) of this section, and administered by the Deputy Mayor for Planning
and Economic Development.
(b)(1) All funds deposited into the Fund shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance
of the General Fund of the District at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be
continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (c) of this section without
regard to the fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.
(2) Any funds that are transferred through intra-District funding and are not expended
in any fiscal year shall revert to the Fund and be available for use in the subsequent fiscal year.
(c) The Fund shall be distributed to every BID and Main Street solely to support efforts to
provide and maintain public restroom facilities within their respective BID or Main Street areas.
Sec. 3. Public Restrooms in DC Parks
DPR shall include at least one gender neutral public restroom facility in all new and
substantially renovated parks that are one acre or more in size.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (12 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the


Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ l-206.02(c)(l)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.